Hawaii statutes.
§269-92 Renewable portfolio standards.
(a) Each electric utility company that sells electricity for consumption in
the State shall establish a renewable portfolio standard of:

(1) Ten per cent of its net electricity sales by
December 31, 2010;

(2) Fifteen per cent of its net electricity sales by
December 31, 2015;

(3) Thirty per cent of its net electricity sales by
December 31, 2020;

(4) Forty per cent of its net electricity sales by
December 31, 2030;

(5) Seventy per cent of its net electricity sales by
December 31, 2040; and

(6) One hundred per cent of its net electricity sales
by December 31, 2045.

(b) The public utilities commission may
establish standards for each utility that prescribe what portion of the
renewable portfolio standards shall be met by specific types of renewable
energy resources; provided that:

(1) Prior to January 1, 2015, at least fifty per cent
of the renewable portfolio standards shall be met by electrical energy
generated using renewable energy as the source, and after December 31, 2014,
the entire renewable portfolio standard shall be met by electrical generation
from renewable energy sources;

(2) Beginning January 1, 2015, electrical energy
savings shall not count toward renewable energy portfolio standards;

(3) Where electrical energy is generated or displaced
by a combination of renewable and nonrenewable means, the proportion
attributable to the renewable means shall be credited as renewable energy; and

(4) Where fossil and renewable fuels are co-fired in
the same generating unit, the unit shall be considered to generate renewable
electrical energy (electricity) in direct proportion to the percentage of the
total heat input value represented by the heat input value of the renewable
fuels.

(c) If the public utilities commission
determines that an electric utility company failed to meet the renewable
portfolio standard, after a hearing in accordance with chapter 91, the utility
shall be subject to penalties to be established by the public utilities
commission; provided that if the commission determines that the electric
utility company is unable to meet the renewable portfolio standards due to
reasons beyond the reasonable control of an electric utility, as set forth in
subsection (d), the commission, in its discretion, may waive in whole or in
part any otherwise applicable penalties.

(d) Events or circumstances that are outside
of an electric utility company's reasonable control may include, to the extent
the event or circumstance could not be reasonably foreseen and ameliorated:

(1) Weather-related damage;

(2) Natural disasters;

(3) Mechanical or resource failure;

(4) Failure of renewable electrical energy producers
to meet contractual obligations to the electric utility company;

(5) Labor strikes or lockouts;

(6) Actions of governmental authorities that
adversely affect the generation, transmission, or distribution of renewable
electrical energy under contract to an electric utility company;

(7) Inability to acquire sufficient renewable
electrical energy due to lapsing of tax credits related to renewable energy
development;

(8) Inability to obtain permits or land use approvals
for renewable electrical energy projects;

(9) Inability to acquire sufficient cost-effective
renewable electrical energy;

(10) Inability to acquire sufficient renewable
electrical energy to meet the renewable portfolio standard goals beyond 2030 in
a manner that is beneficial to Hawaii's economy in relation to comparable
fossil fuel resources;

(11) Substantial limitations, restrictions, or
prohibitions on utility renewable electrical energy projects; and

(12) Other events and circumstances of a similar
nature. [L 2001, c 272, §3; am L 2004, c 95, §5; am L 2006, c 162, §5; am L
2009, c 155, §3; am L 2015, c 97, §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next